Wyoming, session 2025, HB0266.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-7-128 is created to read:

35-7-128. Food truck licenses; requirements.

(a) As used in this section, "food truck" means a
fully encased food establishment on a motor vehicle or
trailer that is pulled by a motor vehicle from which a
person, from within the frame of the vehicle or trailer,
HB0266

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0732
prepares, cooks, sells or serves food or beverages for
immediate human consumption. "Food truck" shall not include
a pushcart or an ice cream truck.

(b) If a food truck is licensed to operate under any
ordinance, rule or regulation in a Wyoming county, city or
town, that license shall be valid and recognized throughout
the state.

(c) Food trucks shall at all times be able to provide
satisfactory evidence of the following:

(i) A license from the department of
agriculture, a local health department or local health
officer for processing, distributing, storing or preparing
food for sale pursuant to W.S. 35-7-124;

(ii) If required, a sales tax license from the
department of revenue pursuant to W.S. 39-15-106;

(iii) Compliance with reasonable fire safety
standards for food trucks as determined by rule of the
department;
HB0266

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0732

(iv) Compliance with other applicable federal
and state laws or regulations governing the operation of a
food truck or commercial establishment.

Section 2. W.S. 35-7-110(a)(xi), (xxxi)(intro) and
(xxxii) is amended to read:

35-7-110. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xi) "Establishment" means and includes any
place or any area of any establishment, including a food
truck as defined in W.S. 35-7-128(a), in which foods,
drugs, devices and cosmetics are displayed for sale,
manufactured, processed, packed, held or stored.
"Establishment" does not include a home kitchen where food
is prepared and stored for family consumption, or any other
place equipped for the preparation, consumption and storage
of food on the premise by employees or nonpaying guests;

HB0266

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0732
(xxxi) "Commercial food establishment" means and
includes any place or any area of any establishment that is
a wholesale or retail business, including a food truck as
defined in W.S. 35-7-128(a), where foods, drugs, devices
and cosmetics are displayed for sale, manufactured,
processed, packed, held or stored. "Commercial food
establishment" shall not include:

(xxxii) "This act" means W.S. 35-7-109 through
35-7-126 35-7-128.

Section 3. The department of agriculture and
department of health shall promulgate all rules necessary
to implement the provisions of this act.

HB0266

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0732
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0266